Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Chapter 18. Short-term Loans.

§ 6.2-1800.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Affiliate”
means a person related to a licensee by common ownership or control, or any employee or agent of a licensee.

“Annual percentage rate”
has the same meaning as in the federal Truth in Lending Act (15 U.S.C. § 1601 et seq.) and its implementing regulations, as they may be amended from time to time. All fees and charges payable directly or indirectly by a borrower to a licensee as a condition to a loan, including interest and the monthly maintenance fees authorized under §

6.2-1817

, shall be included in the computation of the annual percentage rate.

“Check”
means a draft drawn on the account of an individual at a depository institution.

“Depository institution”
means a bank, savings institution, or credit union.

“Interest”
means all charges payable directly or indirectly by a borrower to a licensee as a condition to a loan, including fees, service charges, and renewal charges, and any ancillary product sold in connection with a loan, but does not include the monthly maintenance fees, deposit item return fees, or late charges authorized under §

6.2-1817

.

“Licensee”
means a person to whom a license has been issued under this chapter.

“Loan amount”
means the principal amount of a loan, exclusive of fees or charges.

“Principal”
means any person who, directly or indirectly, owns or controls (i) 10 percent or more of the outstanding stock of a stock corporation or (ii) a 10 percent or greater interest in a nonstock corporation or a limited liability company.

“Short-term loan”
means a loan made pursuant to this chapter.

History.

2002, c. 897, § 6.1-444; 2005, c. 571; 2010, c. 794; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258 amended the Chapter 18 heading, effective January 1, 2021, to read “Short-term Loans.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 3 provides: “That any person not licensed under Chapter 15 (§

6.2-1500

et seq.), Chapter 18 (§

6.2-1800

et seq.), or Chapter 22 (§

6.2-2200

et seq.) of Title 6.2 of the Code of Virginia who will be required to be licensed when the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act become effective shall apply for a license on or before October 1, 2020. Any license issued by the State Corporation Commission to any such person prior to January 1, 2021, shall become effective January 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and in the Chapter 18 heading, substituted “Short-term Loans” for “Payday Lenders”; inserted the definitions for “Affiliate,” “Annual percentage rate,” “Interest,” “Loan amount” and “Short-term loan” and deleted the definition for “Payday loan,” which read: “ ‘Payday loan’ means a small, short-maturity loan on the security of (i) a check, (ii) any form of assignment of an interest in the account of an individual at a depository institution, or (iii) any form of assignment of income payable to an individual, other than loans based on income tax refunds.”

Law Review.

For symposium, “Payday Lending, Bankruptcy, and Insolvency,” see 69 Wash & Lee L. Rev. 607 (2012).

§ 6.2-1801.
License requirement.

No person shall engage in the business of making loans to individuals for personal, family, household, or other nonbusiness purposes, and charge, contract for, or receive, directly or indirectly, on or in connection with any loan interest, charges, compensation, consideration, or expense that in the aggregate is greater than the interest permitted by §

6.2-303

, whether or not the person has a location in the Commonwealth, except as provided and authorized by this chapter, Chapter 15 (§

6.2-1500

et seq.), or Chapter 22 (§

6.2-2200

et seq.) and without having first obtained a license under this chapter from the Commission.

No person shall engage in the business of arranging or brokering short-term loans for any consumer residing in the Commonwealth, whether or not the person has an office or conducts business at a location in the Commonwealth.

The provisions of subsection A shall apply to any person who seeks to evade its application by any device, subterfuge, or pretense whatsoever, including:

The loan, forbearance, use, or sale of (i) credit, as guarantor, surety, endorser, comaker, or otherwise; (ii) money; (iii) goods; or (iv) things in action;

The use of collateral or related sales or purchases of goods or services, or agreements to sell or purchase, whether real or pretended; receiving or charging compensation for goods or services, whether or not sold, delivered, or provided; and

The real or pretended negotiation, arrangement, or procurement of a loan through any use or activity of a third person, whether real or fictitious.

Any loan made in violation of this section is void, and no person shall have the right to collect, receive, or retain any principal, interest, fees, or other charges in connection with the loan.

History.

2002, c. 897, § 6.1-445; 2005, c. 571; 2010, c. 794; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and
rewrote subsection A, which had read: “No person shall engage in the business of making payday loans to any consumer residing in the Commonwealth, whether or not the person has an office or conducts business at a location in the Commonwealth, except in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and without having first obtained a license under this chapter from the Commission”; in subsection B, substituted “short-term loans” for “payday loans”; and added subsections C and D.

Law Review.

For article, “Borrowing in the Shadow of Death: Another Look at Probate Lending,” see 59 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 2447 (2018).

§ 6.2-1802.
Applicability.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to any depository institution that does not elect to become licensed under this chapter. Electing to become licensed under this chapter shall constitute a waiver of the benefit of any and all laws of the Commonwealth and other states and federal laws preemptive of, or inconsistent with, the provisions of this chapter.

History.

2002, c. 897, § 6.1-446; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1803.
Application for license; form; content; fee.

An application for a license under this chapter shall be made in writing, under oath and on a form provided by the Commissioner.

The application shall set forth:

The name and address of the applicant;

If the applicant is a firm or partnership, the name and address of each member of the firm or partnership;

If the applicant is a corporation or a limited liability company, the name and address of each officer, director, registered agent, and each principal;

The addresses of the locations of the offices to be approved; and

Such other information concerning the financial responsibility, background, experience and activities of the applicant and its members, officers, directors, and principals as the Commissioner may require.

The application shall be accompanied by payment of an application fee of $500 or other reasonable amount that the Commission prescribes by regulation.

The application fee shall not be refundable in any event. The fee shall not be abated by surrender, suspension, or revocation of the license.

History.

2002, c. 897, § 6.1-447; 2010, c. 794; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and added “or other reasonable amount that the Commission prescribes by regulation” in subsection C.

§ 6.2-1804.
Bond required.

The application for a license shall be accompanied by a bond filed with the Commissioner with corporate surety authorized to execute such bond in the Commonwealth, in the sum of $10,000 per office, or such greater sum as the Commission may require, but not to exceed a total of $500,000. The form of such bond shall be approved by the Commission. The bond shall be continuously maintained thereafter in full force. The bond shall be conditioned upon the applicant or licensee performing all written agreements with borrowers or prospective borrowers, correctly and accurately accounting for all funds received by him in his licensed business, and conducting his licensed business in conformity with this chapter and all other applicable law. Any person who may be damaged by noncompliance of the licensee with any condition of such bond may proceed on such bond against the principal or surety thereon, or both, to recover damages. The aggregate liability under the bond shall not exceed the penal sum of the bond.

History.

2002, c. 897, § 6.1-448; 2010, c. 794; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and in the first sentence, inserted “or such greater sum as the Commission may require, but” and substituted “$500,000” for “$50,000.”

§ 6.2-1805.
Investigation of applications.

The Commissioner may make such investigations as he deems necessary to determine if the applicant has complied with all applicable provisions of law and regulations adopted thereunder.

History.

2002, c. 897, § 6.1-449; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1806.
Qualifications.

Upon the filing and investigation of an application for a license, and compliance by the applicant with the provisions of §§

6.2-1803

and

6.2-1804

, the Commission shall issue and deliver to the applicant the license applied for to engage in business under this chapter at the offices specified in the application if it finds:

That the financial responsibility, character, reputation, experience, and general fitness of the applicant and its members, senior officers, directors, and principals are such as to warrant belief that the business will be operated efficiently and fairly, in the public interest and in accordance with law; and

That the applicant has unencumbered liquid assets per office available for the operation of the business of at least $25,000.

If the Commission fails to make such findings, no license shall be issued and the Commissioner shall notify the applicant of the denial and the reasons for such denial.

History.

2002, c. 897, § 6.1-450; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1807.
Licenses; places of offices; changes.

Each license shall:

State the address of each approved office at which the business is to be conducted;

State fully the name of the licensee; and

Be prominently posted in each office of the licensee.

No licensee shall:

Use any name other than the name set forth on the license issued by the Commission; or

Open an additional office or relocate any office without prior approval of the Commission.

Applications for Commission approval to open an additional office or relocate any office shall be made in writing on a form provided by the Commissioner and shall be accompanied by payment of a $150 nonrefundable application fee or other reasonable amount as the Commission may prescribe by regulation. The application shall be approved unless the Commission finds that the applicant does not have the required liquid assets or has not conducted business under this chapter efficiently, fairly, in the public interest, and in accordance with law. The application shall be deemed approved if notice to the contrary has not been mailed by the Commission to the applicant within 30 days of the date the application is received by the Commission. After approval, the applicant shall give written notice to the Commissioner within 10 days of the commencement of business at the additional office or relocated office.

Every licensee shall within 10 days notify the Commissioner, in writing, of the closing of any office and of the name, address, and position of each new senior officer, member, partner, or director and provide such other information with respect to any such change as the Commissioner may reasonably require.

Licenses shall:

Not be transferable or assignable, by operation of law or otherwise; and

Remain in force until they have been surrendered, revoked, or suspended. The surrender, revocation, or suspension of a license shall not affect any preexisting legal right or obligation of the licensee.

History.

2002, c. 897, § 6.1-451; 2010, c. 794; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and
added “or other reasonable amount as the Commission may prescribe by regulation” in subsection C in the first sentence at the end.

§ 6.2-1808.
Acquisition of control; application.

Except as provided in this section, no person shall acquire, directly or indirectly, 25 percent or more of the voting shares of a corporation or 25 percent or more of the ownership of any other person licensed to conduct business under this chapter unless such person first:

Files an application with the Commission in such form as the Commissioner may prescribe from time to time;

Delivers such other information to the Commissioner as the Commissioner may require concerning the financial responsibility, background, experience, and activities of the applicant, its directors, senior officers, principals and members, and of any proposed new directors, senior officers, principals or members of the licensee; and

Pays such application fee as the Commission may prescribe.

Upon the filing and investigation of an application, the Commission shall permit the applicant to acquire the interest in the licensee if it finds that the applicant, its members if applicable, its directors, senior officers and principals, and any proposed new directors, members, senior officers and principals have the financial responsibility, character, reputation, experience and general fitness to warrant belief that the business will be operated efficiently and fairly, in the public interest, and in accordance with law. The Commission shall grant or deny the application within 60 days from the date a completed application accompanied by the required fee is filed unless the period is extended by order of the Commissioner reciting the reasons for the extension. If the application is denied, the Commission shall notify the applicant of the denial and the reasons for the denial.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to (i) the acquisition of an interest in a licensee, directly or indirectly, including an acquisition by merger or consolidation, by or with a person licensed by this chapter, (ii) the acquisition of an interest in a licensee, directly or indirectly, including an acquisition by merger or consolidation, by or with a person affiliated through common ownership with the licensee, or (iii) the acquisition of an interest in a licensee by a person by bequest, descent, survivorship or operation of law. The person acquiring an interest in a licensee in a transaction that is exempt from filing an application by this subsection shall send written notice to the Commissioner of such acquisition within 30 days of its closing.

History.

2002, c. 897, § 6.1-452; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1809.
Retention of books, accounts, and records.

Every licensee shall maintain in its approved offices such books, accounts and records as the Commission may reasonably require in order to determine whether such licensee is complying with the provisions of this chapter and regulations adopted in furtherance thereof. Such books, accounts and records shall be maintained apart and separate from any other business in which the licensee is involved. Such records relating to short-term loans, including copies of checks given to a licensee as security for such loans, shall be retained for at least three years after final payment is made on any loan.

History.

2002, c. 897, § 6.1-453; 2004, c. 295; 2010, c. 794; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and substituted “short-term loans” for “payday loans” in the last sentence.

§ 6.2-1810.
Loan database.

The Commission shall certify and contract with one or more third parties to develop, implement, and maintain a real-time, Internet-accessible database that contains such short-term loan information as the Commission may require from time to time by administrative rule or policy statement.

The following provisions shall apply to the database:

Before making a short-term loan, a licensee shall query the database through a Commission-certified database provider and shall retain evidence of the query for the Commission’s supervisory review. The database shall allow a licensee to make a short-term loan only if making the loan is permissible under the provisions of this chapter. During any period that the database is unavailable due to technical problems beyond the licensee’s control, a licensee may rely on the loan applicant’s written representations, rather than the database’s information, to verify that making the loan applied for is permissible under the provisions of this chapter. Because a licensee may rely on the accuracy of the applicant’s representations and the database’s information, a licensee is not subject to any administrative penalty or civil liability if that information is later determined to be inaccurate.

The database provider shall maintain the database, take all actions it deems necessary to protect the confidentiality and security of the information contained in the database, be responsible for the confidentiality and security of such information, and own the information contained in the database. The Commission shall have access to and utilize the database as a supervision and enforcement tool to ensure licensees’ compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

Upon a licensee’s query, the database shall advise the licensee whether the applicant is eligible for a new short-term loan and, if the applicant is ineligible, the reason for such ineligibility. If the database advises the licensee that the applicant is ineligible for a short-term loan, then the applicant shall direct any inquiry regarding the specific reason for such ineligibility to the database provider rather than to the licensee. The information contained in the database is confidential and exempt from the Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.).

If a licensee and borrower consummate a loan, then the licensee shall pay a fee to defray the costs of submitting the database inquiry. The amount of the database inquiry fee shall be calculated in accordance with a schedule set by the Commission. The schedule shall bear a reasonable relationship to actual cost of the operation of the database. If a licensee submits a database inquiry but does not consummate a loan with the applicant, then the licensee shall not pay the database inquiry fee. Each licensee shall remit all database inquiry fees directly to the database provider on a weekly basis.

If a borrower enters into a short-term loan or pays or otherwise satisfies a short-term loan in full, then the licensee making the loan shall report such event or other information to the database not later than the close of business on the date of such event.

History.

2008, cc. 849, 876, § 6.1-453.1; 2010, c. 794; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and substituted “short-term loan” for “payday loan” throughout the section; in subsection A, deleted the last sentence, which read: “The database shall be operational by January 1, 2009”; in subdivision B 1, deleted “payday” preceding “loan applicant’s” in the third sentence; in subdivision B 2, substituted “a supervision and enforcement” for “an enforcement” in the second sentence; in subdivision B 3, deleted “payday loan” preceding “database” in the last sentence; in subdivision B 4, deleted “payday” preceding “loan” in the first and the penultimate sentences; and in subdivision B 5, deleted “or if a borrower enters into an extended payment plan as provided in subdivision 26 of §

6.2-1816

or an extended term loan as provided in subdivision 27 of §

6.2-1816

” following “loan in full.”

§ 6.2-1811.
Annual report.

Each licensee under this chapter shall annually, on or before March 25, file a written report with the Commissioner containing such information as the Commissioner may require concerning his business and operations during the preceding calendar year as to each approved office. Reports shall be made under oath and shall be in the form prescribed by the Commissioner.

The Commissioner shall publish annually and make available to the public an analysis of the information required under this section and other information the Commissioner may choose to include. The published analysis shall include all of the following:

The total number of borrowers, loans, defaulted loans, and charged-off loans and the total dollar value of the charged-off loans;

The average loan size, average contracted annual percentage rate, average contracted loan charges, average loan charges actually paid, total contracted loan charges, and total loan charges actually paid;

The total number of deposit item return fees and the total dollar value of those charges;

The total number of licensee business locations and the average number of borrowers per location; and

A summary of pending and completed enforcement actions, which shall include lists of suspended or revoked licenses, cease and desist orders, and civil penalties pursuant to this chapter.

History.

2002, c. 897, § 6.1-454; 2010, c. 794; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and
added subsection B.

§ 6.2-1812.
Other reporting requirements.

A licensee shall file a written report with the Commissioner within 15 days following the occurrence of any of the following:

The filing of bankruptcy, reorganization or receivership proceedings by or against the licensee;

The institution of administrative or regulatory proceedings against the licensee by any governmental authority;

Any felony indictments of the licensee or any of its members, partners, directors, officers, or principals;

Any felony conviction of the licensee or any of its members, partners, directors, officers, or principals; and

Such other event as the Commission may prescribe by regulation.

The report shall be in writing and describe the event and its expected impact on the business of the licensee.

History.

2002, c. 897, § 6.1-455; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1813.
Investigations; examinations.

The Commission may, as often as it deems necessary, investigate and examine the affairs, business, premises and records of any person licensed or required to be licensed under this chapter or any person who may be violating §

6.2-1801

. Examinations of licensees shall be conducted at least once in each three-year period. In the course of such investigations and examinations, the owners, members, officers, directors, partners, and employees of such person being investigated or examined shall, upon demand of the person making such investigation or examination, afford full access to all premises, books, records, and information that the person making such investigation or examination deems necessary. For the foregoing purposes, the person making such investigation or examination shall have authority to administer oaths, examine under oath all the aforementioned persons, and compel the production of papers and objects of all kinds.

History.

2002, c. 897, § 6.1-456; 2003, c. 593; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1814.
Annual fees.

To defray the costs of examination, supervision and regulation, every licensee shall pay an annual fee calculated in accordance with a schedule set by the Commission. The schedule shall bear a reasonable relationship to the business volume of licensees, the actual costs of their examinations, and to other factors relating to their supervision and regulation. All such fees shall be assessed on or before September 15 for every calendar year. All such fees shall be paid by the licensee to the State Treasurer on or before October 15 following each assessment.

In addition to the annual fee prescribed in subsection A, when it becomes necessary to examine or investigate the books and records of a licensee at a location outside the Commonwealth, the licensee shall be liable for and shall pay to the Commission within 30 days of the presentation of an itemized statement, the actual travel and reasonable living expenses incurred on account of its examination, supervision and regulation, or shall pay at a reasonable per diem rate approved by the Commission.

History.

2002, c. 897, § 6.1-457; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1815.
Regulations.

The Commission shall adopt such regulations as it deems appropriate to effect the purposes of this chapter. Before adopting any such regulation, the Commission shall give reasonable notice of its content and shall afford interested parties an opportunity to be heard, in accordance with the Commission’s Rules.

History.

2002, c. 897, § 6.1-458; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1816.
Required and prohibited business methods.

Each licensee shall comply with the following requirements and prohibitions:

A licensee shall not make a loan that does not comply with §

6.2-1816.1

.

A licensee shall not charge, collect, or receive, directly or indirectly, credit insurance premiums, charges for any ancillary product sold, charges for disbursing loan proceeds or refunds including check-cashing charges and any other charges for negotiating forms of payment other than cash, charges for brokering or obtaining a loan, or any fees, interest, or charges in connection with a loan, other than fees and charges permitted by §

6.2-1817

.

A licensee shall not obtain any agreement from the borrower (i) giving the licensee or any third person power of attorney or authority to confess judgment for the borrower; (ii) authorizing the licensee or any third party to bring suit against the borrower in a court outside the Commonwealth; or (iii) waiving the borrower’s right to legal recourse or any other right the borrower has under any otherwise applicable provision of state or federal law.

A licensee shall not make a loan to a person if that person is obligated upon any loan to a person licensed under Chapter 22 (§

6.2-2200

et seq.). Prior to making a loan, a licensee shall make a reasonable attempt to verify the borrower’s eligibility under this subsection that includes reviewing the files of any affiliate that is licensed under Chapter 22. Unless the Commission requires otherwise by administrative rule or policy statement, a licensee may rely on the loan applicant’s written representations with respect to the applicant’s obligations to lenders that are licensed under Chapter 22 (§

6.2-2200

et seq.) but are not affiliates of the licensee, and a licensee is not subject to any administrative penalty or civil liability if such representations are later determined to be inaccurate.

A licensee shall not cause any person to be obligated to the licensee in any capacity at any time in the principal amount of more than $2,500.

Except as provided in §

6.2-1818.1

, a licensee shall not refinance, renew, or extend any short-term loan or make a loan to a person if the loan would cause the person to have more than one short-term loan from any licensee outstanding at the same time.

A licensee shall not cause a borrower to be obligated upon more than one loan at any time.

A check accepted by a licensee as security for any loan shall be dated no earlier than the date of the first required loan payment shown in the loan agreement.

Notwithstanding any provision of §

8.01-226.10

to the contrary, a licensee shall not threaten, or cause to be instigated, criminal proceedings against a borrower if a check given as security for a loan is dishonored or for any reason related to the borrower’s failure to pay any sum due under a loan agreement.

A licensee shall not (i) accept the title or registration of a vehicle, real or personal property, or any interest in any property other than a check payable to the licensee as security for a loan; (ii) create or accept any remotely created check, as defined in 12 C.F.R. § 229.2(fff), in connection with a loan; (iii) draft funds electronically from a borrower’s account without express written authorization from the borrower; or (iv) fail to stop attempts to draft funds electronically from a borrower’s account upon request from the borrower or his agent. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the conversion of a negotiable instrument into an electronic form for processing through the automated clearing house system.

A licensee shall not present a check, negotiable order of withdrawal, share draft, or other negotiable instrument that has been previously presented by the licensee and subsequently returned dishonored for any reason, unless the licensee obtains new written authorization from the borrower to present the previously returned item.

A licensee shall not attempt to draft funds electronically from a borrower’s account after two consecutive attempts have failed, unless the licensee obtains new written authorization from the borrower to transfer or withdraw funds electronically from the borrower’s account.

A licensee shall not make a loan to a borrower to enable the borrower to (i) pay for any other product or service sold at the licensee’s office location or (ii) repay any amount owed to the licensee or an affiliate of the licensee in connection with another credit transaction.

Loan proceeds shall be disbursed in cash or by the licensee’s business check. No fee shall be charged by the licensee or an affiliate for cashing a loan proceeds check.

A check given as security for a loan shall not be negotiated to a third party.

Upon receipt of a check given as security for a loan, the licensee shall stamp the check with an endorsement stating: “This check is being negotiated as part of a short-term loan pursuant to Chapter 18 (§

6.2-1800

et seq.) of Title 6.2 of the Code of Virginia, and any holder of this check takes it subject to all claims and defenses of the maker.”

Before entering into a short-term loan, the licensee shall provide each borrower with a pamphlet, in form consistent with regulations adopted by the Commission, explaining in plain language the rights and responsibilities of the borrower and providing a toll-free number at the Commission for assistance with complaints.

Each licensee shall conspicuously post in each approved office (i) a schedule of fees and interest charges, which shall include examples using a $300 loan repaid in three months, a $500 loan repaid in five months, and a $1,000 loan repaid in 10 months, and (ii) a notice containing the following statement: “If you wish to file a complaint against us, you may contact the Bureau of Financial Institutions at [insert contact information].” The Commission shall furnish licensees with the appropriate contact information.

A licensee shall not knowingly make a short-term loan to a person who is a member of the military services of the United States or the spouse or other dependent of a member of the military services of the United States. Prior to making a short-term loan, every licensee shall inquire of every prospective borrower if he is a member of the military services of the United States or the spouse or other dependent of a member of the military services of the United States. The loan documents shall include verification that the borrower is not a member of the military services of the United States or the spouse or other dependent of a member of the military services of the United States.

In collecting or attempting to collect a short-term loan, a licensee shall comply with the restrictions and prohibitions applicable to debt collectors contained in the Fair Debt Collection Practices Act (15 U.S.C. § 1692 et seq.) regarding harassment or abuse, false or misleading misrepresentations, and unfair practices in collections.

A licensee shall not contact a borrower for any reason other than (i) for the borrower’s benefit regarding upcoming payments, options for obtaining loans, payment options, payment due dates, the effect of default, or, after default, receiving payments or other actions permitted by the licensee; (ii) to advise the borrower of missed payments or dishonored checks; or (iii) to assist the transmittal of payments via a third-party mechanism.

A short-term loan agreement shall not be sold or otherwise assigned to any other person who is not also a licensee, and if a loan agreement or its servicing is sold or assigned to another licensee, the buyer or assignee of the loan agreement shall be subject to the same obligations under this chapter that apply to the selling or assigning licensee. If a licensee sells or assigns a short-term loan or its servicing, the licensee shall provide to the borrower written notice and the information needed to make future payments no later than 10 days before the borrower’s next payment due date.

A licensee shall not make a loan to a borrower that includes an acceleration clause or demand feature that permits the licensee, in the event the borrower fails to meet the repayment terms for any outstanding balance, to terminate the loan in advance of the original maturity date and to demand repayment of the entire outstanding balance, unless both of the following conditions are met: (i) not earlier than 10 days after the borrower’s payment was due, the licensee provides written notice to the borrower of the termination of the loan and (ii) in addition to the outstanding balance, the licensee collects only prorated interest and the fees earned up to termination of the loan. For purposes of this subdivision, the outstanding balance and prorated interest and fees shall be calculated as if the borrower had voluntarily prepaid the loan in full on the date of termination.

A licensee may not file or initiate a legal proceeding of any kind against a borrower until 60 days after the date of default on a short-term loan, during which period the licensee and borrower may voluntarily enter into a repayment arrangement.

A licensee shall not recommend to a borrower that the borrower obtain a loan for a dollar amount that is higher than the borrower has requested.

A licensee may not engage in any unfair, misleading, deceptive, or fraudulent acts or practices in the conduct of its business.

History.

2002, c. 897, § 6.1-459; 2003, c. 593; 2004, c. 295; 2005, c. 571; 2008, cc. 849, 876; 2010, c. 794; 2016, c. 501; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 501, in subdivision 1, substituted “Consumer Financial Protection Bureau” for “Federal Reserve Board,” and “1026” for “226.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and rewrote the section.

Law Review.

For article, “Borrowing in the Shadow of Death: Another Look at Probate Lending,” see 59 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 2447 (2018).